Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 14

Notaries Public

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

21-14-101. Appointment and commission.

(1)The Secretary of State may appoint and commission an individual person as a notary public in this state.

Effective January 1, 2006, a notary public may perform notarial acts in any part of the state for a term of ten (10) years, beginning on the date of commission or the date of renewal of a commission issued by the Secretary of State.

Every applicant for appointment and commission as a notary public shall complete an application to be filed with the Secretary of State stating:

(Signature of circuit clerk)”.

The notary public shall send an executed and signed original of the declaration to the Secretary of State.

Effective January 1, 2006, the Secretary of State shall issue a commission number to each new notary public and to each notary public who renews his or her commission.

History.

Acts 1874, No. 17, § 1, p. 61; C. & M. Dig., § 7969; Pope's Dig., § 10362; Acts 1981, No. 672, § 1; 1985, No. 966, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1401; Acts 1989, No. 304, § 2; 2001, No. 1274, § 1; 2005, No. 2274, § 1; 2009, No. 1404, § 1; 2013, No. 492, § 1; 2017, No. 537, § 2; 2019, No. 215, §§ 1-3.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added (e) and (f); rewrote (a)(2); and substituted “Secretary of State” for “clerk of the circuit court of the county” in (d)(1).

The 2009 amendment inserted present (e) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2013 amendment added (b)(4); inserted (d), and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2017 amendment added (f)(3).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (b)(1); inserted “place of employment” in (b)(2); in the introductory language of (e), inserted “or nonresident spouse of a United States military service member” and substituted “of his or her place of employment or business” for “where employed”; and, in (g)(1), inserted “or a nonresident spouse of a United States military service member” and substituted “of his or her place of employment or business” for “where employed”.

21-14-102. Change of residence.

Upon receiving notification of a change of residency, the Secretary of State shall transfer a notary public's appointment and commission to the new county of residence in instances in which a person appointed and commissioned a notary public under § 21-14-101 changes residence to a county within this state other than the county where the notary public resided on the date of commission.

Upon receiving notification of a change in place of employment, the Secretary of State shall transfer a notary public's appointment and commission to the new county of employment in the case of a resident of an adjoining state or a nonresident spouse of a United States military service member changing his or her place of employment to a county within this state other than the county where the notary public was employed on the date of commission.

The original bond or certified copy of the original bond from the original county of residence shall also be filed by the notary public in the new county of residence or if the notary public is a resident of an adjoining state or a nonresident spouse of a United States military service member, in the new county of employment in Arkansas.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2013 amendment inserted “or certified copy of the original bond from the original county of residence” in (b).

The 2019 amendment inserted “or a nonresident spouse of a United States military service member” in (a)(2) and (b).

If the notary public marries and the notary public's name changes, a certified copy of the marriage certificate shall be delivered to the office of the Secretary of State and the circuit clerk for the county where the notary public resides or if the notary public is a resident of an adjoining state, the circuit clerk for the county in Arkansas where he or she is employed.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment redesignated former (a)(1)-(3) as present (a)-(c); rewrote present (a) and (c); and deleted former (b).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 21, § 1; 1985, No. 966, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1401.1; Acts 2005, No. 2274, § 1; 2013, No. 492, § 2; 2019, No. 215, § 4.

21-14-103. Change in personal information.

If any notary public has a change in his or her mailing address or status in life that alters the information on record with the Secretary of State and the circuit clerk for the county where the notary public resides or if the notary public is a resident of an adjoining state, the circuit clerk for the county in Arkansas where he or she is employed, the notary public shall be responsible for providing that change of information to the Secretary of State and the circuit clerk within thirty (30) calendar days of the change.

If the change in status involves a court order, the notary public shall be responsible for providing the Secretary of State with a certified copy of the court order within thirty (30) calendar days of the filing of the court order with the clerk.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 104, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 7975; Pope's Dig., § 10368; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1410; Acts 2001, No. 1274, § 2; 2005, No. 2274, § 1.

21-14-104. Power and authority generally.

The power and authority of a notary public shall be coextensive with the state for:

Swearing witnesses;

Taking affidavits;

Taking depositions under Rule 28 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure and Rule 28 of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure; and

Taking acknowledgments of deeds and other instruments in writing and authorized by law to be acknowledged.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

Notary's removal from county of his appointment renders his acts in taking affidavits null and void. Lanier v. Norfleet, 156 Ark. 216, 245 S.W. 498 (1922).

History.

Acts 1901, No. 82, § 1, p. 148; 1905, No. 269, § 1, p. 687; C. & M. Dig., § 7970a; Pope's Dig., § 10363; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1405; Acts 2013, No. 492, § 3.

21-14-105. Administration of oaths.

Each notary public shall have power to administer oaths in all matters incident to or belonging to the exercise of his or her notarial office.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 104, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 7970; Pope's Dig., § 10363; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1403.

21-14-106. Acknowledgments and authentications.

A notary public may:

Take the proof or the acknowledgment of all instruments of writing relating to commerce and navigation;

Receive and authenticate acknowledgments of deeds, letters of attorney, and other instruments of writing;

Make declarations and protests; and

Certify under his or her official seal the truth of all matters and things done by virtue of his or her office.

A notary public may supervise the making of a photocopy of an original document and attest that the document is a copy if the document is not:

A vital record in this state, another state, a territory of the United States, or another country; or

A public record, if a copy can be made by the custodian of the public record.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment made no changes to this section.

A notary public is not disqualified to take an acknowledgment to a mortgage by reason of the fact that he acted as agent for the mortgagor in obtaining the loan of money which the mortgage was intended to secure. Penn v. Garvin, 56 Ark. 511, 20 S.W. 410 (1892).

A notary public may refuse to perform a notarial act for any reason, including when the principal:

Does not appear to understand the nature of the transaction that requires the notarial act;

Does not appear to be acting of his or her own free will;

Lacks the ability to sign a notarial document using letters or characters of a language that is understood by the notary public; or

Is not able to communicate directly with the notary public in a language understood by the principal and the notary public.

A signature by mark on a notarial document is legal for the purposes of executing the notarial document if the mark is:

Made by a person who at the time of signature lacks the ability to write or sign his or her name; and

Witnessed by at least one (1) disinterested person.

The notary public shall write below a signature by mark:

“Mark affixed by (Name of signer by mark) in the presence of (name(s) of witnesses)”.

When a principal is physically unable to sign or make a mark on a notarial document, a disinterested third party may sign the name of the principal if:

The principal directs the disinterested third party to sign the name of the principal in the presence of two (2) disinterested witnesses;

The disinterested third party signs the name of the principal in the presence of the notary public, the principal, and the disinterested witnesses;

Each disinterested witness signs his or her own name beside the signature;

The notary public writes below the signature:

“Signature affixed by (name of third party) at the direction and in the presence of (name of principal unable to sign or make a mark) and also in the presence of (names of two witnesses)”; and

The notary public notarizes the required notarial certificate.

(1)Under or near a notary public's official signature on every notary certificate, the notary public shall provide a seal of his or her office in blue or black ink, which shall be either a rubber stamp seal or a seal embosser. The seal shall be clear and legible and capable of photographic reproduction.

The notary public's name exactly as he or she writes his or her official signature;

The name of the county where the notary public's bond is filed;

The words “notary public” and “Arkansas”;

The date upon which the notary public's commission expires; and

The notary public's commission number issued by the Secretary of State if the notary public has been issued a commission number.

A notary seal shall not include the Seal of the State of Arkansas or an outline of the state.

The seal and certificate of the notary public commission are the exclusive property of the notary public and must be kept in the exclusive control of the notary public.

The seal and certificate of the notary public commission shall not be surrendered to an employer upon termination of employment, regardless of whether or not the employer paid for the seal or for the commission.

For a notarial act involving a document, a notary public shall complete a notarial certificate that is worded in English.

The notarial certificate shall include:

The official signature of the notary public as described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section;

The official seal of the notary as described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section;

The venue of the notarial act, including the name of the state and county; and

The date of the notarial act.

A notarial certificate is incomplete if:

The information within the notarial certificate is known or believed by the notary public to be false;

A notary public affixes an official signature or seal on a notarial certificate that is incomplete under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section;

An official signature or seal on a notarial certificate is known to be executed at a time when the principal or signer was not present; or

A signed or sealed notarial certificate is executed with the understanding that the notarial certificate will be completed or attached to a document outside of the presence of the notary public.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment by No. 2274 substituted “commission” for “notary” in (b)(2)(D); added (b)(2)(E); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment inserted “in blue or black ink” in (a)(1) and (b)(1).

The 2017 amendment substituted “is” for “shall be” in (a)(2); added (a)(3) through (a)(5); and added (f).

Cross References. Seals of public officers to contain emblem of state, §1-4-108.

The absence from a notary's seal of the emblems and devices required by this section does not invalidate his certificate of the acknowledgment of a deed. Sonfield v. Thompson, 42 Ark. 46 (1883).

(1)Every notary public shall attach to any certificate of acknowledgment or jurat to an affidavit that he or she may make a statement of the date on which his or her commission will expire.

No notary public shall perform any official act after the expiration of his or her commission as evidenced by his or her certificate.

Sixty (60) calendar days prior to the expiration of a notary public's commission, he or she shall submit to the Secretary of State a new application along with the fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for the renewal of the commission.

Every notary public shall file in the office of the recorder of deeds for the county where the notary public resides or if the notary public is a resident of an adjoining state, in the office of the recorder of deeds for the county in Arkansas where employed, either:

Has previously registered with the Insurance Commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner evidencing the corporation's purpose to issue only surety contracts for notaries public pursuant to the provisions of this section;

Has deposited and maintains with the commissioner securities in the sum of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) executed to the State of Arkansas that are issued by a nonaffiliated corporate entity and are approved by the commissioner; and

Is not otherwise transacting any insurance business in this state that requires compliance with the provisions of the Arkansas Insurance Code.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “Secretary of State” for “clerk of the circuit court of the county” in (d)(1).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Sixty (60)” for “Thirty (30)” in (c).

It shall be lawful for any notary public who is a stockholder, director, officer, or employee of a bank or other corporation to take the acknowledgment of any party to any written instrument executed to or by the corporation, or to administer an oath to any other stockholder, director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, or to protest for nonacceptance or nonpayment bills of exchange, drafts, checks, notes, and other negotiable instruments which may be owned or held for collection by the corporation.

It shall be unlawful for any notary public to take the acknowledgment of an instrument executed by or to a bank or other corporation of which he or she is a stockholder, director, officer, or employee where the notary public is a party to the instrument, either individually or as a representative of the corporation, or to protest any negotiable instrument owned or held for collection by the corporation, where the notary public is individually a party to the instrument.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 104, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 7973; Pope's Dig., § 10366; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1404; Acts 2001, No. 1274, § 3; 2005, No. 2274, § 2.

21-14-107. Signature — Seal.

(1)At the time of notarization, the notary public shall sign his or her official signature in blue or black ink on every notary certificate.

The official signature is the signature on file with the Secretary of State at the time of signing.

The seal shall include:

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 104, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 7976; Pope's Dig., § 10369; Acts 1981, No. 672, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1402; Acts 2001, No. 1274, § 4; 2005, No. 1962, § 104; 2005, No. 2274, § 2; 2013, No. 492, § 4; 2017, No. 537, § 3.

21-14-108. Expiration date of commission.

No acknowledgment or other act of a notary public shall be held invalid on account of the failure to comply with this section.

A surety bond executed by a surety insurer authorized to do business in Arkansas for the faithful discharge of the notary public's duties in the sum of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), to be approved by the Secretary of State; or

A surety contract guaranteeing the notary public's faithful discharge of his or her duties executed to the State of Arkansas for not more than an aggregate seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), issued by a general business corporation validly organized and formed under the laws of this state pertaining to domestic corporations and which:

History.

Acts 1891, No. 35, §§ 1, 2, p. 57; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7971, 7972; Pope's Dig., §§ 10364, 10365; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1406, 12-1407; Acts 2001, No. 1274, § 5; 2005, No. 2274, § 2; 2015, No. 570, § 2.

21-14-109. Performance of duties for corporation.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 331, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1411.

21-14-110. Admissibility of acknowledged instruments.

All declarations and protests made and acknowledgments taken by a notary public and certified copies of the notary public's records and official papers shall be received as evidence of the facts therein stated in all the courts of this state.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 104, § 8; C. & M. Dig., § 7977; Pope's Dig., § 10370; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1409.

21-14-111. Unlawful act — Penalty — Definition.

It is unlawful for any notary public to witness any signature on any instrument unless the notary public either:

Witnesses the signing of the instrument and personally knows the signer or is presented proof of the identity of the signer; or

Recognizes the signature of the signer by virtue of familiarity with the signature.

Any notary public violating this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

For purposes of this section, “personally knows” means having an acquaintance, derived from association with the individual, which establishes the individual's identity with at least a reasonable certainty.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment deleted (b)(2) and made related changes; and added (c).

Where bank sought to take advantage of its own wrongful conduct in notarizing and accepting wife's signature as forged by her husband on a promissory note, its conduct was improper and unconscionable and barred by the clean hands doctrine. Merchants & Planters Bank & Trust Co. v. Massey, 302 Ark. 421, 790 S.W.2d 889 (1990).

Issue of fact remained as to whether a notary was liable for witnessing forged signatures pursuant to this section, and therefore whether the surety was liable on its bond issued under §21-14-101, because, if she recognized the signature, she was permitted to witness it without watching the signer sign the documents.Southern Dev. Corp. v. Freightliner of New Hampshire, Inc., 2009 Ark. App. 286, 307 S.W.3d 597 (2009).

Under this section, §16-47-205, and former §28-68-304 (see now §28-68-105), the decedent's attorney's secretary signed the certificate of acknowledgement for the November 20 power of attorney before the decedent signed the instrument, and this improper notarization of the acknowledgement was fatal to the validity of the November 20 power of attorney.Jones v. Owen, 2009 Ark. 505, 342 S.W.3d 265 (2009).

Cited: Porter v. McCuen, 310 Ark. 674, 839 S.W.2d 521 (1992).

Submits an application for commission and appointment that contains substantial and material misstatement or omission of fact;

Is convicted of official misconduct under the provisions of § 21-14-111;

Knowingly uses false or misleading advertising in which the notary public represents that the notary public has powers, duties, rights, or privileges that the notary public does not possess by law;

Is found by a court of this state to have engaged in the unauthorized practice of law;

Is found by a court to have improperly notarized documents according to the law;

Is found by a court to have charged fees higher than allowed under § 21-6-309; or

Fails to complete the requirements under § 21-14-101.

A person whose notary public commission has been revoked pursuant to the provisions of this section may subsequently apply for commission and appointment as a notary public after ten (10) years have elapsed from the date of the revocation.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “five (5) years” for “three (3) years” in (d); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment inserted (a)(6) and redesignated former (a)(6) as (a)(7); and substituted “ten (10) years” for “five (5) years” in (d).

History.

Acts 1989, No. 304, § 3; 2001, No. 1274, § 6.

21-14-112. Denial or revocation of notary public commission.

The Secretary of State may deny the application of any person for appointment or reappointment or revoke the commission of any notary public during the notary public's term of appointment if the notary public:

The Secretary of State may investigate a possible violation of this section upon a signed complaint from any person.

After a notary public receives notice from the Secretary of State that the notary public's commission has been revoked, unless the revocation has been enjoined the notary public shall immediately send or have delivered to the Secretary of State:

The notary public's journal of notarial acts;

All other papers and copies relating to the notary public's notarial acts; and

The notary public's official seal.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1187, § 1; 2005, No. 2274, § 3; 2013, No. 492, § 5.

21-14-113. Notice of revocation — Appeal.

If the Secretary of State revokes a notary public commission, he or she shall serve the notary public with written notice that explains the reason or reasons for the revocation.

(1)The notary public may appeal the revocation to the Pulaski County Circuit Court within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of revocation is perfected.

The notary public shall appeal by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State's Certificate of Revocation and the written notice of revocation.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the notary public or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1187, § 2.

21-14-114. Rules.

The Secretary of State may promulgate rules necessary to administer this chapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2274, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 2339.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading and following “rules” in the section.

Subchapter 2

— Facsimile Signatures and Seals

Effective Dates. Acts 1995, No. 200, § 5: Feb. 9, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “Many commercial documents are required to include a notary certificate to comply with terms imposed by purchase orders, business contracts, construction standards, testing standards and other commercial practices. Where such documents are produced by computer and subscribed by an affiant in facsimile form, substantial time and expense is required for a notary public to manually sign, seal and affix notary certificates as required by present law, which increases operating costs, makes Arkansas business less competitive and costs Arkansas jobs. Arkansas law presently permits authorized officers to sign and seal public securities and instruments of payment by facsimile signature and seal under similar circumstances, following a filing with the secretary of state (Ark. Code Ann. §21-10-101 et seq.), but has no similar provision for notaries public on commercial documents. Operating costs may be reduced and expensive business equipment may be more fully utilized by allowing notaries public to affix notary certificates bearing facsimile signatures and seals under appropriate circumstances. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1274, § 8: Apr. 4, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the notary public law needs to be updated and reformed immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

21-14-201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Commercial document” means any instrument, certificate, report, billing, affidavit, or other document which is required to bear a notary certificate by the terms of a purchase order, contract, bid specification, construction standard, testing standard, or other commercial standard, specification, or practice.

The term “commercial document” shall not include any deed or other instrument in writing for the conveyance of any real estate or by which any real estate may be affected in law or equity;

“Facsimile seal” means the reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means of the seal of office of a notary public, containing the information described in § 21-14-107(b)(2); and

“Facsimile signature” means the reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means of a manual signature of a notary public.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 200, § 1.

21-14-202. Use of facsimile signatures and seals authorized — Filing required.

Any notary public may affix a notary certificate bearing the notary public's facsimile signature and facsimile seal in lieu of the notary public's manual signature and rubber or embossed seal in blue or black ink on a commercial document, after filing with the Secretary of State:

The notary public's manual signature certified by the notary public under oath;

A general description of the types of commercial documents to be notarized by facsimile signature and seal;

The name and manual signature of any other person or persons signing the commercial documents by manual or facsimile signature; and

The written consent of any other person or persons signing the commercial documents to the use of the notary public's facsimile signature and facsimile seal on the commercial documents.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “in blue or black ink” in the introductory language.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 200, § 1; 2013, No. 492, § 6.

21-14-203. Expiration and resignation.

Any filing by a notary public with the Secretary of State under the terms of this subchapter shall remain in effect until the earlier of:

The date on which the notary public's commission in effect on the date of filing expires;

The filing is cancelled by the notary public by subsequent written filing with the Secretary of State; or

The filing is cancelled pursuant to § 21-14-113.

A notary public shall send a signed letter of resignation to the Secretary of State and shall return his or her certificate of notary public commission when the notary public:

Wishes to resign his or her commission;

Does not maintain legal residence or employment in this state during the entire term of appointment; or

Is required to resign pursuant to a court order of this state or any other state.

The resigning notary public shall destroy his or her official seal immediately upon resignation.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment added “and resignation” in the section heading; and added (a)(3) and (b) and made related changes.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 200, § 1; 2001, No. 1274, § 7.

21-14-204. Duties of notary public.

A notary public shall have the same duties when affixing a notary certificate with the notary public's facsimile signature and facsimile seal on a commercial document as when signing a notary certificate with the notary public's manual signature and rubber or embossed seal, and nothing in this subchapter shall remove any duty or responsibility imposed on a notary public by law, except as specifically provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 200, § 1.

21-14-205. Force and effect.

Notary certificates which are signed by facsimile signature and sealed by facsimile seal under the provisions of this subchapter shall have the same force and effect as notary certificates signed by manual signature and bearing a rubber or embossed seal for all purposes.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 200, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Arkansas Electronic Notary Public Act

21-14-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Electronic Notary Public Act”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 306, § 1.

21-14-302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;

“Electronic document” means information that is created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means;

“Electronic notarial act” means an official act by a notary public performed with respect to an electronic document and using electronic means authorized by the Secretary of State.

“Electronic notarial act” includes:

Taking an acknowledgment;

Administering an oath or affirmation;

Taking a verification on oath or affirmation;

Witnessing or attesting a signature;

Certifying or attesting a copy; and

Noting a protest of a negotiable instrument;

“Electronic notarial certificate” means the portion of a notarized electronic document that:

Is completed by the notary public;

Bears the following of the notary public:

Signature or official electronic seal;

Official title;

Commission number;

Commission expiration date; and

All required information regarding the date and place of the electronic notarial act; and

States the facts attested to or certified by the notary public in an electronic notarization;

“Electronic notary seal” or “official electronic seal” means information within a notarized document that includes:

The following information about the notary public:

Name;

Jurisdiction of appointment;

Commission number; and

Commission expiration date; and

Information that generally corresponds to dates in notary public seals utilized on paper documents under § 21-14-107;

“Electronic notary public” means a notary public who has registered with the Secretary of State and possesses the capability of performing electronic notarial acts;

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to an electronic document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic document;

“Non-repudiation” means the inability of the signer of an electronic document to deny his or her electronic signature without a factual basis;

“Notary public electronic signature” means the forms of electronic signatures that have been approved by the Secretary of State as an acceptable means for an electronic notary to affix his or her official signature to an electronic record that is being notarized;

“Physical proximity” means the principal and the notary public are physically close enough to see, hear, communicate, and give identification credentials to each other without reliance on an electronic device such as a telephone, computer, video camera, or facsimile machine;

“Registration” or “register” means a separate commission to perform electronic notarial acts under the laws of this state;

“Solution provider” means a business entity that has submitted an application, meets standards, and has been approved by the Secretary of State to offer electronic notarization solutions to duly commissioned electronic notaries public;

“Tamper-evident” means any changes to an electronic document that display evidence of the change;

“Traditional notary public” means a person commissioned by the Secretary of State to perform notarial acts under this chapter; and

“Unique to the electronic notary public” or “under the sole control” means the device or system the notary uses to sign and seal the document that is accessible only by the notary, attributed to the notary, and not any other person or entity.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 306, § 1.

21-14-303. Appointment and commission.

A notary public who is appointed and commissioned by the Secretary of State as a traditional notary public and who is in good standing with the Secretary of State is eligible to become an electronic notary public.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 306, § 1.

21-14-304. Registration and application.

The Secretary of State shall require a notary public to register the capability to notarize electronically before performing an electronic notarial act.

The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules to enforce the requirement under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section.

A person who seeks to become an electronic notary public shall submit to the Secretary of State:

An application stating the intent to become an electronic notary public on a form provided by the Secretary of State;

An attestation that he or she has not been convicted of a felony; and

A filing fee of twenty dollars ($20.00).

An applicant shall:

Successfully complete an approved training course provided by the Secretary of State; and

Pass an examination approved by the Secretary of State.

An applicant may attend the examination up to two (2) times in a twelve-month period.

If the applicant does not pass the examination during the time period in subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section, he or she shall repeat the application process under this section.

The commission date of the electronic notary public shall begin on the date the person passes the examination under § 21-14-304.

The term of the electronic notary public shall not extend past the expiration date of the surety bond for the traditional notary public commission.

An electronic notary public shall every two (2) years of his or her commission:

Complete a refresher training course offered and approved by the Secretary of State; and

Remit to the Secretary of State evidence of successful completion of the course under subdivision (c)(1) of this section on a form provided by the Secretary of State.

The electronic notary public may submit an application for the renewal of his or her electronic notary commission to the Secretary of State no more than thirty (30) calendar days before the expiration of his or her electronic notary commission.

To renew an electronic notary commission, a person shall complete the procedure under § 21-14-304.

Complete an electronic notarial certificate that shall include all information necessary in a paper-based notarization under § 21-14-107; and

Attach his or her electronic signature and seal to the certificate in a tamper-evident manner.

Evidence of tampering may be used as proof by the Secretary of State to determine whether the electronic notarial act is valid or invalid.

The electronic signature of an electronic notary public is reliable if the electronic seal is:

Retained under the sole control of the electronic notary public; and

Attached to or associated with the electronic document in a tamper-evident manner.

Law enforcement;

The courts; or

An electronic document preparation and transmission vendor.

Control of security aspects remains under the sole control of the commissioned electronic notary public, and include without limitation:

Passwords;

Token devices;

Biometrics;

Personal identification numbers; and

Phrases.

The liability, sanctions, and remedies for the improper performance of electronic notarial acts are the same under the law for the improper performance of a notarial act performed by a traditional notary public under §§ 21-14-111 — 21-14-113.

An electronic notary public shall not perform an electronic notarial act if the document signer does not appear in person before the electronic notary public at the time of the electronic notarial act.

(1)The methods for identifying a document signer for an electronic notarial act shall be the same as the methods required for a paper-based notarization under this chapter.

An electronic notary public may charge and collect fees that are:

(1)An electronic notary public who knowingly charges, demands, or receives a fee not authorized by law or who charges, demands, or receives a fee greater than provided under this section is guilty of a violation.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 13: Oct. 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas children and their parents or guardians should be secure in the knowledge that persons employed by the State who have direct contact with children do not have criminal records and are not a potential threat to the safety of their children; and that an increasing number of incidents are occurring where persons employed by the State are abusing children entrusted into the care of the State; and that in some cases these incidents could have been avoided had the persons been subjected to a criminal records check. It is further found and determined that, in some instances, allegations of employee criminal misconduct involving children are not being investigated. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on October 1, 1997.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2015, No. 861, § 9: Mar. 31, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an audit by the Federal Bureau of Investigation found that the Department of Human Services is out of compliance with federal law regarding the confidentiality of criminal background checks; and that this act is immediately necessary because the public health and safety are at risk so long as the department remains out of compliance with federal law because of the threat of easy access to confidential records of criminal background checks. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 2017, No. 306, § 1.

21-14-305. Term and renewal.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 306, § 1.

21-14-306. Form and manner of performing electronic notarial act.

An electronic notarial act shall be executed through an approved solution provider.

When performing an electronic notarial act, an electronic notary public shall:

Unique to the electronic notary public;

Capable of independent verification;

(1)The electronic signature of an electronic notary public in combination with the electronic notary seal shall be used only for the purpose of performing an electronic notarial act.

The electronic notary public shall not disclose access information used to affix the electronic signature of the electronic notary public except when requested by:

History.

Acts 2017, No. 306, § 1.